South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S499.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.   The regulations of the Department of Labor, Licensing and Regulation - State Athletic Commission, relating to State Athletic Commission, designated as Regulation Document Number 5351, and submitted to the General Assembly pursuant to the provisions of Article 1, Chapter 23, Title 1 of the S.C. Code, are approved. SECTION 2.   This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XXX---- SUMMARY AS SUBMITTED BY PROMULGATING AGENCY. The South Carolina State Athletic Commission proposes to amend regulations in Chapter 20 of the Code of Regulations following its five-year regulatory review conducted pursuant to S.C. Code Section 1-23-120. The Notice of Drafting was published in the State Register on May 24, 2024. ----XX----